Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 13 District Attorneys’ Retirement System

47-13-1 through 47-13-91.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 2173, §§ 1-19, Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, §§ 14-16, Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47, Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1, Ga. L. 1990, p. 523, § 1, Ga. L. 1990, p. 865, §§ 1-4, Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1, Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1, Ga. L. 1992, p. 1024, § 1, Ga. L. 1992, p. 2355, §§ 1-3, Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1, Ga. L. 1993, p. 800, § 1, Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18, Ga. L. 1994, p. 335, § 1, Ga. L. 1995, p. 651, § 8, Ga. L. 1995, p. 787, § 4, Ga. L. 1995, p. 1065, § 1, Ga. L. 1996, p. 728, § 1, Ga. L. 1996, p. 733, § 1, Ga. L. 1996, p. 799, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 2, effective July 1, 1998.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 2 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 1998.